District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
7 Act may be cited as the “Apprenticeships and Credentials as Pathways to Prosperity Act of
8 2025”.
9
10 Sec. 2. Definitions.
11 For the purposes of this act, the term:
12 (1) “Academic year” shall have the same meaning as provided in 20 U.S.C. §
13 1088(a)(2).
14 (2) “AMI” means the area median income for a household in the Washington
15 Metropolitan Statistical Area as set forth in the periodic calculation provided by the U.S.
16 Department of Housing and Urban Development (“HUD”), adjusted for family size, without
17 regard to any adjustments made by HUD for the purposes of the programs it administers.
18 (3) “Applicant” means a person who has submitted a Program application during
19 the current application cycle.
20 (4) “Apprentice” has the same meaning as provided in D.C. Official Code § 32-
21 1407.
1

22 (5) “Apprenticeship” means an apprenticeship program that is registered with the
23 Apprenticeship Council.
24 (6) “DC TAG” means the tuition assistance grant program established
25 pursuant to the District of Columbia College Access Act of 1999, approved November 12,
26 1999 (113 Stat. 1323; D.C. Official Code § 38-2701 et seq.) and administered by the Office
27 of the State Superintendent of Education.
28 (7) “Eligible non-tuition expenses” means non-tuition costs associated with
29 attending an institution of higher education, including housing, meals, healthcare,
30 transportation, childcare, other costs of attendance, and other uses as determined by the
31 Mayor through rulemaking.
32 (8) “Fund” means the Pathways to Prosperity Fund established by section 4 of
33 this act.
34 (9) “Graduate” means a participant who has completed the academic
35 program or apprenticeship program and the requirement of living and working in the
36 District as required under section 5(a)(5) of this act.
37 (10) “Industry-recognized credential” means a nationally recognized, transferable
38 credential within the industry in which an apprentice is employed that is conferred upon the
39 apprentice upon or before the apprentice’s completion of the apprenticeship.
40 (11) “Living loan” means a zero-interest forgivable loan to students to be used for
41 eligible non-tuition expenses.
42 (12) “Participant” means a student or apprentice in the Program.
43 (13) “Participating employer” means an employer in a target industry who
44 employs students or apprentices as an approved employer under this act.
2

45 (14) “Participating institution” means the University of the District of Columbia
46 (UDC), University of the District of Columbia Community College (“UDC-CC”), Workforce
47 Development of Lifelong Learning (“WDLL”), or any accredited nonprofit postsecondary
48 institution or related-instruction provider approved by the Deputy Mayor for Education
49 (“DME”).
50 (15) “Program” means the Pathways to Prosperity Program established by this act
51 and includes both the degree and apprenticeship pathways.
52 (16) “Recognized equivalent of a secondary school diploma” means a general
53 equivalency degree (“GED”) or other recognized equivalent as determined by the Mayor
54 through rulemaking.
55 (17) “Related instruction” means the required academic or technical instruction
56 provided to an apprentice by a participating institution in compliance with the apprenticeship
57 approved by the Apprenticeship Council.
58 (18) “Related instruction loan” means a zero-interest forgivable loan supporting
59 related-instruction costs.
60 (19) “Satisfactory academic progress” means maintaining an academic
61 standing consistent with the requirements for graduation, as determined by the participating
62 institution.
63 (20) “Student” means a person accepted to participate in the degree pathway of
64 the Program.
65 (21) “Target field of study” means an undergraduate program that is necessary for
66 employment in a target industry.
67 (22) “Target industry” means Computer Science, Information Technology,
3

68 Construction Management, Early Childhood Education, Hospitality, and Healthcare, and any
69 other industries identified by the DME.
70 (23) “Tuition loan” means a zero-interest forgivable loan to be used for the tuition
71 and tuition-related expenses required to pursue a target field of study at a participating
72 institution.
73 (24) “Tuition-related expenses” means:
74 (i) Required student fees;
75 (ii) Textbooks; and
76 (iii) Supplies and equipment required by or for courses.
77 (25) “Working in the District” means employment in which the participant’s
78 primary work location is in the District, or duties are substantially performed in the District, or
79 the employer withholds DC income tax.
80 Sec. 3. Establishment and Administration of Pathways to Prosperity.
81 (a) There is established the Pathways to Prosperity program (“Program”), the purpose
82 of which is to:
83 (1) Develop resident talent in high-growth and high-demand industries;
84 (2) Reduce financial barriers to higher education and training;
85 (3) Expand apprenticeships and degree-based workforce pipelines; and
86 (4) Strengthen employer hiring and retention of District residents.
87 (b) To accomplish the purposes set out in subsection (a), the Program shall:
88 (1) Establish, maintain, and administer the Pathways to Prosperity Fund;
89 (2) Establish a degree program through which students pursue secondary degrees
90 in target fields of study at participating institutions and receive jobs in target industries upon
4

91 graduation from the academic program;
92 (3) Establish an apprenticeship program through which apprentices receive on-
93 the-job training from employers in target industries and related instruction at UDC or other
94 participating institutions;
95 (4) Provide:
96 (A) Supportive programming to participants;
97 (B) Zero-interest forgivable loans for tuition and fees not covered by
98 non-loan assistance; and
99 (C) Zero-interest forgivable loans to support additional costs associated
100 with higher education and living expenses; and
101 (5) Establish and maintain a process for reporting the data required by section 11
102 of this Act.
103 (c)(l) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the Deputy Mayor
104 for Education (“DME”) shall administer the Program.
105 (2) The DME shall establish an office to develop and manage the Program. This
106 office shall be responsible for:
107 (A) Providing Program support services to applicants, participants,
108 participating employers, and participating institutions, including developing supporting materials
109 and resources;
110 (B) Monitoring compliance with Program requirements;
111 (C) Coordinating between relevant entities involved in the Program,
112 including the Apprenticeship Council, UDC, participating employers, and participating
113 institutions;
5

114 (D) Providing opportunities for students engaged in the Career and
115 Technical Education program at high schools in the District to connect with the Program; and
116 (E) Collecting the data required by section 11 of this Act.
117 (3) If the Mayor determines that it would result in more efficient administration,
118 the Mayor may enter into a grant, contract, or cooperative agreement with another public entity
119 or with a not-for-profit private entity, which may include participating institutions, to administer
120 part or all of the Program; provided, that the entity selected has a minimum of 5 years of
121 experience in the component of the Program that the entity is administering.
122 (4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Mayor shall provide or
123 enter into a contract or cooperative agreement with a public or private employer to provide
124 industry- or company-specific career guidance and opportunities, including mentorship,
125 internships, fellowships, apprenticeships, or job placements, in addition to required supportive
126 programming.
127 (d) The Mayor shall enter into a memorandum of understanding or similar cooperative
128 agreement governing the partnership with each participating institution. The memorandum shall
129 provide for the administration of the Program at each participating institution, including the
130 tuition loan, the living loan, and required supportive programming. The memorandum may
131 provide for additional requirements at the Mayor’s discretion, including further supportive
132 programming.
133 Sec. 4. Establishment of the Pathways to Prosperity Fund.
134 (a) There is established as a special fund the Pathways to Prosperity Fund (“Fund”),
135 which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with this section.
136 (b) The Fund shall consist of revenue from the following sources:
6

137 (1) Annual appropriations;
138 (2) Federal, private, or philanthropic grants;
139 (3) Loan repayments;
140 (4) Gifts and donations.
141 (c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the Fund shall be used solely for
142 the purposes of this Act for:
143 (1) Loans issued under the Program;
144 (2) Supportive programming; and
145 (3) Data systems and reporting.
146 (d) The Mayor may use not more than 5% of the funds deposited into the Fund to pay the
147 administrative expenses of the Program for the fiscal year.
148 (e)(1) The money deposited in the Fund, and any interest earned, shall not revert to the
149 unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal
150 year, or at any other time.
151 (2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
152 appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.
153 Sec. 5. Pathways to Prosperity eligibility.
154 (a) An individual shall be eligible for the Program if the individual:
155 (1)(A) Has been a resident of the District of Columbia for at least 12 consecutive
156 months prior to the application date, or
157 (B) Graduated, or will graduate from, a District of Columbia secondary
158 school or home school program during the current calendar year or within 3 years prior;
159 (2) Has an annual household taxable income of no more than 80% of AMI;
7

160 (3) Has not already completed an associate or bachelor’s degree at an institution
161 of higher education or wishes to change careers or pursue education opportunities that will
162 provide a more sustainable income;
163 (4) Commits to pursuing a field of study and career in a target industry;
164 (5) Commits to working and living in the District for at least 2 years immediately
165 following Program completion; and
166 (6) Meets any other requirements determined by the Mayor to be necessary or
167 appropriate, as set forth in rulemaking.
168 (b) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a)(1) and (a)(2), an individual in the
169 District’s foster care system who was placed outside the District by the foster care system who
170 meets all other eligibility requirements of this section shall be deemed eligible to participate in
171 the Program so long as the individual resides in the District for the duration of the individual’s
172 participation in the Program.
173 (c) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a)(1), a District resident released
174 from the custody of the District of Columbia Department of Corrections, the District Department
175 of Youth Rehabilitation Services, or the Federal Bureau of Prisons within the 12 months
176 preceding the application date who meets all other eligibility requirements of this section shall be
177 deemed eligible to participate in the Program so long as the individual resides in the District for
178 the duration of the individual’s participation in the Program.
179 (d) No individual shall be prohibited from participating in any aspect of the Program for
180 which they are otherwise qualified due to the individual’s criminal history; provided that the
181 individual shall receive counseling, pursuant to section 9(e) of this Act, as to any criminal history
182 restrictions that may exist in the job or career path they are interested in pursuing.
8

183 (e) An individual who has experienced homelessness in the District during the 12 months
184 prior to the individual’s application date may meet the requirements of subsection (a)(1) by self-
185 certification that the individual resided in the District during the required period.
186 Sec. 6. Conditions of participation.
187 (a)(1) Individuals shall re-certify eligibility each academic year during which they
188 participate in the Program.
189 (2) To maintain Program eligibility an individual shall meet all requirements
190 established in section 5 and:
191 (A) Apply for federal financial aid, if eligible, and provide proof to the
192 Mayor of the application for and the acceptance or denial of federal financial aid.
193 (B) Maintain at least half-time status at a participating institution;
194 (C) Maintain satisfactory academic progress at a participating institution
195 or satisfactory progress in an apprenticeship;
196 (D) Participate in supportive programming as required by UDC or another
197 participating institution;
198 (E) Continue to be a resident of the District throughout participation in the
199 Program;
200 (F) Maintain a commitment to living and working in the District as
201 required under section 5(a)(5) of this act;
202 (G) Meet any other requirements determined by the Mayor to be necessary
203 or appropriate, as set forth in rulemaking.
204 (c) An institution of higher education may waive the requirements in subsection (b)(2)
205 based on undue hardship because a student has:
9

206 (1) Experienced the death of a relative;
207 (2) A personal injury or illness; or
208 (3) Another special circumstance as determined by the institution of higher
209 education to warrant a waiver;
210 (4) Provided, that the waiver shall be subject to approval by the DME.
211 Sec. 7. Degree pathway.
212 (a)(1) The Program shall provide a tuition loan to each student. The funds for the tuition
213 loan shall be drawn from the Fund and disbursed by the DME. The tuition loan shall be
214 forgivable upon completion of the conditions in section 10 of this Act.
215 (2) Since the Program loans shall cover the full cost of tuition and living
216 expenses, participants shall not apply for other student loans.
217 (3) The tuition loan shall not exceed the lesser of:
218 (A) The published full-time undergraduate tuition, books, and mandatory
219 fees charged by the University of the District of Columbia and
220 (B) The published tuition and mandatory fees of the participating
221 institution, whichever amount is lower.
222 (4) For students attending a participating institution other than UDC, the Program
223 may cover tuition, books and mandatory fees above UDC’s published tuition only if:
224 (A) Federal Pell Grants, DC TAG, institutional aid, and private
225 scholarships have been applied first; and
226 (B) The remaining amount to be covered does not exceed 20% above the
227 equivalent full-time tuition at UDC, unless waived by DME based on program necessity.
228
10

229 (b) The Program shall provide a living loan to each student. The funds for the living loan
230 shall be drawn from the Fund and disbursed by the DME.
231 (1)(A) The living loan shall be equal to the difference between the tuition loan
232 and the participating institution’s published cost of attendance.
233 (B) The DME shall establish annual maximum living-expense caps based
234 on UDC’s standard student budget.
235 (2) The living loan shall be increased by $5,000 per year for each dependent child
236 in the participant’s household to assist students who are parents or guardians of dependent
237 children. Eligibility for District public benefits shall not be affected by the receipt of this
238 funding.
239 (3) The living loan shall be forgivable upon completion of the conditions in
240 section 10 of this Act.
241 (c) Tuition loans and living loans shall be counted as the last dollar after all other
242 scholarships and grants, including DC TAG, and before a recipient’s private or federal student
243 loans.
244 (d) UDC and UDC-CC are approved as participating institutions and shall:
245 (1) Provide a list of existing majors, minors, or certificates qualifying as target
246 fields of study to the DME;
247 (2) Develop and maintain employer partnerships;
248 (3) Administer tuition loans and living loans according to subsections (b) and (c)
249 of this section;
250 (4) Provide supportive programming to students in accordance with section 9 of
251 this Act; and
11

252 (5) Facilitate job placement for students with employers upon graduation.
253 (e) Participating employers shall:
254 (1) Sign a written agreement with the DME;
255 (2) Commit to hire graduates for at least 2 years, provided that the individual
256 remains eligible for employment and remains in good standing; and
257 (3) Provide DC-based employment.
258 Sec. 8. Apprenticeship pathway.
259 (a) The Program shall facilitate the creation of apprenticeships in target industries and
260 provide apprentices with industry-recognized credentials upon completion of the apprenticeship.
261 Apprenticeships shall meet federal and DC Apprenticeship Council standards.
262 (b) Participating employers in the apprenticeship pathway shall:
263 (1) Develop related instruction curriculum with UDC, WDLL, and other
264 participating institutions;
265 (2) Register apprenticeships with the Apprenticeship Council;
266 (3) Provide on-the-job training to apprentices;
267 (4) Pay apprentices at least District minimum wage for hours spent both in on-the-
268 job training and in required related instruction settings;
269 (5) Commit to hiring apprentices upon Program completion for at least two years,
270 provided that the individual remains eligible for employment and remains in good standing;
271 (6) Meet progressive wage schedules aligned to federal apprenticeship standards;
272 and
273 (7) Comply with data and reporting requirements of this act.
274 (c) The Program shall provide a related instruction loan to each apprentice. The funds for
12

275 the related instruction loan shall be drawn from the Fund and disbursed by the DME. The related
276 instruction loan shall be forgivable upon completion of the conditions in section 10 of this Act.
277 (1) The related instruction loan shall be increased by $5,000 per year for each
278 dependent child in the participant’s household to assist apprentices who are parents or guardians
279 of dependent children. Eligibility for District public benefits shall not be affected by the receipt
280 of this funding.
281 (2) Related instruction loans shall be counted as the last dollar after all other
282 scholarships and grants, including DC TAG, and before an apprentice’s private or federal student
283 loans.
284 (3) The related instruction loan shall not exceed the lesser of:
285 (A) The published per-credit tuition rate at UDC for Workforce
286 Development/UDC-CC coursework, multiplied by the number of credits required for the related
287 instruction and
288 (B) The published tuition charges of the participating related instruction
289 provider, whichever is lower.
290 (4) For technical apprenticeships requiring specialized instruction (e.g., aviation
291 maintenance, allied health, IT/cybersecurity), DME may authorize payments up to 25% above
292 UDC’s published rate, provided that:
293 (A) No comparable instruction is available at UDC, UDC-CC or the
294 participating institution; and
295 (B) The employer or intermediary demonstrates inability to absorb the
296 cost.
297 (d) Participating institutions shall provide:
13

298 (1) Curriculum development for related instruction in partnership with target
299 industry employers;
300 (2) Related instruction to apprentices; and
301 (3) Administrative services.
302 (e) The employer shall pay wages for apprentices for on-the-job training. The Program
303 may provide a subsidy to support wages for apprentices for time spent on related instruction, as
304 determined by the DME.
305 Sec. 9. Supportive programming.
306 (a) The Program shall provide supportive programming for Program applicants and
307 participants. The DME may enter into a memorandum of understanding with UDC and any other
308 participating institution for administration of supportive programming.
309 (b) Supportive programming for applicants shall include:
310 (1) Career exploration and industry orientation, the purpose of which shall be to
311 provide applicants with exposure to each target industry to help applicants determine their area
312 of interest.
313 (A) The experience shall include for each target industry:
314 (i) An informational session about the industry, including potential
315 career paths within it and what skills are necessary for each;
316 (ii) A tour or shadow experience in an industry space; and
317 (iii) An opportunity for applicants to ask questions of a current
318 industry employee.
319 (B) The experience shall take place no less than one month prior to the
320 Program application deadline.
14

321 (2) Program, school, and financial aid application counseling. Program
322 application counseling shall include counseling on:
323 (1) Career path selection; and
324 (2) The availability of financial supports for childcare and out-of-school time
325 options.
326 (c) Supportive programming for participants shall run for the duration of the participants’
327 participation in the Program, including the period during which the participants are required to
328 live and work in the District as required under section 5(a)(5) of this act, and shall include:
329 (1) Program, school, and financial aid application counseling, to include where
330 applicable:
331 (i) Counseling regarding credit transfer from other educational institutions;
332 (ii) Counseling regarding applications for loans or external funding;
333 (iii) Counseling regarding the additional assistance for participants with
334 dependent children provided in sections (7)(b)(2) and (8)(c)(1) of this Act and other childcare
335 assistance and public benefit program eligibility; and
336 (iv) Counseling regarding financial planning;
337 (2) Course of study and career counseling, to include career path advising;
338 (3) Academic coaching or mentoring;
339 (3) Financial management and planning;
340 (4) Childcare and public-benefits navigation;
341 (5) Job coaching and placement services, to include job readiness and
342 interpersonal skills training; and
343 (6) For applicants and participants with a criminal history, counseling regarding
15

344 reentry services, where relevant, and any potential effects of the individual’s criminal record on
345 career path selection.
346 Sec. 10. Loan forgiveness.
347 (a) For the purpose of this section, “program loans” shall mean the tuition loan, the living
348 loan, and the related instruction loan.
349 (b) Program loans shall accrue zero interest.
350 (c) All program loans issued under this act shall comply with the funding limits
351 established in Sections 7 and 8. The DME shall:
352 (1) Verify that no tuition or related-instruction loan exceeds the UDC-based
353 maximums;
354 (2) Annually update UDC tuition benchmarks and adjust loan limits accordingly;
355 and
356 (3) Publish maximum allowable loan amounts each fiscal year.
357 (d) Participants shall be eligible for forgiveness of program loans upon completion of the
358 following conditions:
359 (1) Successful completion of the academic program or apprenticeship;
360 (2) Living and working in the District as required under section 5(a)(5) of this act;
361 and
362 (3) Fulfillment of the conditions of participation as provided in section 6 of this
363 Act for the duration of participation in the Program.
364 (e) Participants shall be eligible for graduated loan forgiveness.
365 (1) 50% loan forgiveness shall be granted after one year of DC employment and
366 residency.
16

367 (2) 100% loan forgiveness shall be granted after living and working in the District
368 for the full duration required under section 5(a)(5) of this act.
369 (3) Additional hardship-based pro-rated forgiveness may be approved by DME.
370 (f) Participants who do not meet the requirements for loan forgiveness shall:
371 (1) Repay the loan over a period not to exceed 10 years;
372 (2) Receive a standardized, income-sensitive repayment plan;
373 (3) Be eligible for rehabilitation to restore forgiveness eligibility.
374 (g) The DME may waive any the requirements of subsection (c) of this section on an
375 individual basis if a participant demonstrates a personal or familial hardship to the DME such
376 that the DME determines a waiver of the requirement is necessary. If a participant demonstrates
377 a hardship that would permit the student to take a leave of absence from the participant’s
378 academic program under the rules of the participating institution, then the participant may return
379 to the Program upon the participant’s return to the academic program as funding is available.
380 (e) Additional exceptions to the conditions of this section must be approved by the DME.
381 Sec. 11. Data sharing and reporting.
382 (a) DME may enter into agreements allowing secure sharing of data between UDC,
383 OSSE, DOES, Apprenticeship Council, employers, and institutions, consistent with FERPA and
384 DC law.
385 (b) The Mayor shall submit a report on the Program to the Council by December 1st of
386 every year. The report shall include:
387 (1) Application, acceptance, and enrollment data;
388 (2) Demographics;
389 (3) Employer participation and compliance;
17

390 (4) Apprenticeship wage progression;
391 (5) Loan issuance and forgiveness data;
392 (6) Longitudinal employment and wage outcomes (5-year tracking);
393 (7) Program return on investment and recommendations for improvement;
394 (8) Description of supportive programming provided during each stage of the
395 program;
396 (9) Financial data related to the Fund; and
397 (10) Any other data the DME may deem relevant.
398 Sec. 12. Rules.
399 The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
400 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; DC Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules
401 within 180 days to implement the provisions of this Act including:
402 (a) Eligibility;
403 (b) Program operations;
404 (c) Employer compliance;
405 (d) Forgiveness procedures;
406 (e) Data-sharing systems;
407 (f) Outreach and marketing requirements;
408 (g) Quality assurance for nontraditional providers; and
409 (h) Equity benchmarks.
410 Sec. 13. Applicability.
411 This Act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and
412 financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in
18

413 a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.
414 Sec. 14. Fiscal impact statement.
415 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
416 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
417 approved October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; DC Official Code § 1-301.47a).
418 Sec. 15. Effective date.
419 This Act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
420 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
421 provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
422 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; DC Official Code § l-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
423 Columbia Register.
19